Utah statutes.
9-7-408.   Donations of money or property.

Any person desiring to make donations of money, personal property, or real estate for the benefit of any library shall have the right to vest the title to the money, personal property, or real estate in the board of directors.  The donation shall be held and controlled by the board, when accepted, according to the terms of the deed, gift, devise, or bequest of the property, and the board shall be held and considered to be trustees of the property.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

